Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 10 Handling of Live Poultry

4-10-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the director of environmental management.

“Farmers’ cooperative” means a nonprofit association of producers organized with or without capital stock for the purpose of producing and/or selling food commodities.

“License” means the certificate issued by the director to any person, firm, partnership, or corporation regularly engaged in the business of buying, selling and/or transporting live poultry to be sold or used for food.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-1

.

4-10-2.
Supervision of movement of poultry.

It is the duty of the director of environmental management to supervise the movement of live poultry from place to place within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-2

.

4-10-3.
License to deal in or transport poultry.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation, regularly engaged in the business of buying, selling and/or transporting live poultry to be sold or used for food, shall annually apply to the director for a license to buy, sell, and/or transport live poultry to be so sold or used for food. The application for that license shall be made upon a form prescribed by the director who may, if he or she is satisfied as to the responsibility and character of the applicant, issue a license to the applicant to buy, sell, and/or transport live poultry.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-3

.

4-10-4.
Limited and unlimited licenses — Bond.

Licenses shall be issued in two (2) forms:

A limited license which permits the licensee to do business on a United States currency basis only.

An unlimited license issued to any person, firm, or corporation, as referred to in §

4-10-3

, who furnishes a bond with sufficient surety in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), executed by a surety company authorized to do business within this state, payable to any poultry producer residing in this state that has sold live poultry to that licensed dealer, conditioned upon the faithful performance of all legal obligations incurred in the buying of live poultry from the poultry producer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 3A; P.L. 1955, ch. 3611, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-4

.

4-10-5.
Holding of unlimited licensee’s bond.

The bond required by §

4-10-4(2)

shall be held by the director of environmental management to satisfy any claims held against any licensee because of failure to pay for live poultry purchased by that licensed dealer from the poultry producer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 3A; P.L. 1955, ch. 3611, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-5

.

4-10-6.
Defaults by licensed dealers.

Upon receipt of a written notice of a default in payment, the director of environmental management shall order a hearing to be held before him or her within two (2) weeks. If the claim is approved by the director of environmental management, he or she may order payment to be made directly to the seller of the live poultry by the bonding company. The payment shall be made within two (2) weeks after approval of the claim by the director of environmental management.

All unpaid claims against licensed dealers must be made within three (3) weeks from date of sale of the poultry.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 3A; P.L. 1955, ch. 3611, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-6

.

4-10-7.
Unpaid claims exceeding bond.

If unpaid claims against dealers licensed under §

4-10-4(2)

, made within the period of time prescribed in §

4-10-6(b)

, are in excess of the surety bond, and are approved by the director of environmental management, the amounts may be prorated among the claimants by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 3A; P.L. 1955, ch. 3611, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-7

.

4-10-8.
Issuance and revocation of licenses.

Each license shall be issued annually and may be revoked by the director for cause. If in the judgment of the director any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation made under this chapter has been violated, the director shall send notice by registered or certified mail to the licensee who shall be given a hearing and if violation is proven his or her license shall be revoked.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-8

.

4-10-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-9

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 171, § 1, effective July 9, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 9, 2015.

4-10-10.
Display of license.

Every person operating a vehicle used in the business of buying, selling, and/or transporting live poultry shall deposit or display in that vehicle in some easily accessible place a license to engage in that business as provided by §

4-10-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-10

.

4-10-11.
License fees.

The fee for the first license issued to any one individual or corporation in accordance with this chapter shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-11

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 6; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 198, § 2.

4-10-12.
Bill of sale to accompany poultry in transit.

No person shall transport live poultry in connection with the sale from place to place upon any public highway or road in this state unless he or she has in his or her possession a bill of sale signed by the vendor or agent of that vendor and containing the vendor’s address, the date of transaction, number of poultry, and/or weight, breed and price of poultry and any other information as in the discretion of the director will describe that poultry and establish specifically their proper ownership. The information shall be available at any time to the director or his or her duly authorized agent or agents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-12

.

4-10-13.
Persons and organizations exempt.

This chapter shall not apply to a merchant or a producer of poultry who does not go from place to place buying, selling, and/or transporting live poultry nor shall it apply to a farmers’ cooperative transporting poultry in connection with the operation of a cooperative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-13

.

4-10-14.
Administrative powers of director — Rules and regulations.

The director has authority to administer this chapter. He or she shall make and may modify rules and regulations necessary or incidental to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-14

.

4-10-15.
Enforcement — Prosecution of violations.

It is the duty of the director to enforce this chapter and to prosecute any and all persons who, in his or her opinion, are guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter, and the director or his or her appointed agent or agents are not required to enter into recognizance or become liable for costs. It is the duty of the attorney general to conduct the prosecution of all cases brought by the director or his or her appointed agent or agents under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-15

.

4-10-16.
Penalty for violations.

Any person violating the provisions of this chapter shall be punished for the first offense by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) and for any subsequent offense by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1792, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

4-10-16

.